Washington statutes.
RCW 35.104.020

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Authority" means a health sciences and services authority created pursuant to this chapter.

(2) "Board" means the governing board of trustees of an authority.

(3) "Director" means the executive director of the student achievement council.

(4) "Health sciences and services" means biosciences that advance new therapies and procedures to combat disease and promote public health.

(5) "Local government" means a city, town, or county.

(6) "Sponsoring local government" means a city, town, or county that creates a health sciences and services authority.

[ 2012 c 229 s 580; 2007 c 251 s 1.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2012 c 229 ss 101, 117, 401, 402, 501 through 594, 601 through 609, 701 through 708, 801 through 821, 902, and 904: See note following RCW 28B.77.005.

Captions not law—Severability—2007 c 251: See notes following RCW 35.104.010.